Mississippi statutes. Title 45. Public Safety and Good Order
Article 1. General Provisions.

§ 45-35-1.
Definitions.

For the purposes of this article the following words shall have the meanings herein ascribed unless the context clearly requires otherwise:

“Department” means the Department of Public Safety;

“Commissioner” means the Commissioner of Public Safety; and

“Identification card” means a card issued under the provisions of this article by the Department of Public Safety.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 570, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1988.

§ 45-35-3.
Issuance of identification card by Department of Public Safety; application for card; registered sex offender’s card to identify cardholder as sex offender; designation as veteran on card upon request of honorably discharged veteran.

Any person six (6) years of age or older may be issued an identification card by the department which is certified by the registrant and attested by the commissioner as to true name, correct age and such other identifying data as required by Section 45-35-5.

The new, renewal or duplicate identification card of a person required to register as a sex offender pursuant to Section 45-33-25 shall bear a designation identifying the cardholder as a sex offender.

The commissioner is authorized to provide the new, renewal or duplicate identification card to any honorably discharged veteran as defined in Title 38 of the United States Code, and such identification card shall exhibit the letters “Vet” or any other mark identifying the person as a veteran. The veteran requesting the “Vet” designation shall present his DD-214 or equivalent document that includes a notation from the state Veterans Affairs Board that the applicant is a veteran.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 570, § 2; Laws, 1996, ch. 322, § 2; Laws, 2001, ch. 343, § 1; Laws, 2007, ch. 392, § 15; Laws, 2012, ch. 561, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved May 23, 2012.).

§ 45-35-5.
Data required for issuance of identification card.

Data for the issuance of an identification card shall include a birth certificate or other document to establish the age and identity of the applicant, the social security number of the applicant, and such other identifying data as is required on an application for issuance of a drivers license.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 570, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 1988.

§ 45-35-7.
Expiration; renewal; fees; records; registration with Selective Service.

Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection (1), each applicant for an original or renewal identification card issued pursuant to this chapter who is entitled to issuance of such a card shall be issued a four-year card or an eight-year card, at the option of the applicant. Each card shall expire at midnight on the cardholder’s birthday and may be renewed any time within six (6) months before the expiration date of the card upon application and payment of the required fee.

Any applicant who is blind, as defined in Section 43-6-1, upon payment of the fee prescribed in Section 63-1-43, shall be issued an original or renewal identification card which shall remain valid for a period of eight (8) years, shall expire at midnight on the cardholder’s birthday, and may be renewed any time within six (6) months before the expiration date of the card upon application and payment of the required fee.

Any applicant who is not a United States citizen, upon payment of the fee prescribed in Section 63-1-43, shall be issued an original or renewal identification card which shall expire four (4) years from date of issuance or on the expiration date of the applicant’s authorized stay in the United States, whichever is the lesser period of time, and may be renewed, if the person is otherwise qualified to renew the license, within thirty (30) days of expiration.

An applicant for an original or renewal identification card under paragraph (a) must present valid documentary evidence documenting that the applicant:

Is a citizen or national of the United States;

Is an alien lawfully admitted for permanent or temporary residence in the United States;

Has conditional permanent residence status in the United States;

Has an approved application for asylum in the United States or has entered into the United States in refugee status;

Has a valid, unexpired nonimmigrant visa or nonimmigrant visa status for entry into or lawful presence in the United States;

Has a pending application for asylum in the United States;

Has a pending or approved application for temporary protected status in the United States;

Has approved deferred-action status;

Has pending an application for adjustment of status to that of an alien lawfully admitted for permanent residence in the United States or conditional permanent resident status in the United States; or

Has a valid employment authorization card issued by the United States Department of Homeland Security.

The fee for the issuance of an original or renewal identification card shall be as prescribed in Section 63-1-43.

Any person who, for medical reasons, surrenders his unexpired driver’s license, and any person whose unexpired driver’s license is suspended for medical reasons by the Commissioner of Public Safety under Section 63-1-53(2)(e), upon request shall be issued an identification card without payment of a fee. The identification card shall be valid for a period of four (4) years from its date of issue. Subsequent renewals shall be subject to the fees prescribed in Section 63-1-43.

The department shall maintain a record of all identification cards issued.

Any male who is at least eighteen (18) years of age but less than twenty-six (26) years of age and who applies for an identification card or a renewal of an identification card under this chapter shall be registered in compliance with the requirements of Section 3 of the Military Selective Service Act, 50 USCS Appx 451 et seq., as amended.

The department shall forward in an electronic format the necessary personal information of the applicant to the Selective Service System. The applicant’s submission of the application shall serve as an indication that the applicant either has already registered with the Selective Service System or that he is authorizing the department to forward to the Selective Service System the necessary information for registration. The commissioner shall notify the applicant on, or as a part of, the application that his submission of the application will serve as his consent to registration with the Selective Service System, if so required. The commissioner also shall notify any male applicant under the age of eighteen (18) that he will be registered upon turning age eighteen (18) as required by federal law.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 570, § 4; Laws, 1992, ch. 370, § 1; Laws, 1996, ch. 322, § 1; Laws, 2001, ch. 535, § 5; Laws, 2002, ch. 388, § 3; Laws, 2002, ch. 447, § 1; Laws, 2002, ch. 584, § 7; Laws, 2010, ch. 423, § 3; Laws, 2014, ch. 424, § 3, eff from and after Oct. 1, 2014.

§ 45-35-9.
Duplicates; fee; return of original.

If an identification card issued under this chapter is lost, destroyed or mutilated, or a new name or other updated information is required, the person to whom it was issued may obtain a duplicate by furnishing the same identifying data as for an original card and paying the fee prescribed in Section 63-1-43.

Any person who loses an identification card and who, after obtaining a duplicate, finds the original card shall promptly surrender the original card to the department.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 570, § 5; Laws, 2002, ch. 584, § 2; Laws, 2014, ch. 424, § 4, eff from and after Oct. 1, 2014.

§ 45-35-11.
Form.

All identification cards shall be centrally issued by the department, adequately describe the registrant, bear a color photograph of the registrant, and include other such identifying data as required by Section 45-35-5.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 570, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 1988.

§ 45-35-13.
Unlawful use of cards; penalties.

No person shall:

Display, or cause or permit to be displayed, or have in his possession, any cancelled, fictitious, fraudulently altered or fraudulently obtained identification cards;

Lend an identification card to any person or knowingly permit the use thereof by another;

Display or represent any identification card not issued to him as being his card;

Permit any unlawful use of an identification card issued to him;

Do any act forbidden or fail to perform any act required by this article;

Photograph, photostat, duplicate or in any way reproduce, manufacture, sell or distribute any identification card or facsimile thereof so that it could be mistaken for a valid identification card; or

Display or have in his possession any photograph, photostat, duplicate, reproduction or facsimile of an identification card unless authorized by the provisions of this article.

Any person convicted of a violation of any provision of paragraphs (a), (b), (c), (d), (e) or (g) of subsection (1) of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished by a fine of not more than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) or by imprisonment for not more than thirty (30) days, or by both such fine and imprisonment.

Any person under twenty-one (21) years of age at the time of the offense who is convicted of a violation of paragraph (f) of subsection (1) of this section shall be punished as follows:

A first offense shall be a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00), or by imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, or by both such fine and imprisonment.

A second or subsequent offense, the offenses being committed within a period of five (5) years, shall be a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00), or by imprisonment for not more than one (1) year, or by both such fine and imprisonment.

Any person twenty-one (21) years of age or older at the time of the offense who is convicted of a violation of paragraph (f) of subsection (1) of this section is guilty of a felony and shall be punished by a fine of not less than Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00), or imprisonment for not more than three (3) years, or by both such fine and imprisonment.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 570, § 7; Laws, 1998, ch. 558, § 1; Laws, 2001, ch. 551, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 45-35-15.
Liability of public entities.

No public entity or public official shall be liable for any loss or injury resulting directly or indirectly from false or inaccurate information contained in an identification card issued pursuant to this article.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 570, § 8, eff from and after July 1, 1988.